Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0958.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 352. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3), a railroad shall not operate a train engaged in transporting freight unless the train is operated by a crew of not fewer than 2 individuals. (2) Subsection (1) does not apply under either of the following circumstances: (a) Operating a locomotive in hostler service. (b) Operating a locomotive in helper service. (3) Subsection (1) does not apply if a federal statute or regulation is in effect requiring a train engaged in transporting freight in this state to have a crew of not fewer than 2 individuals. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Helper service" means assisting a train that is experiencing a mechanical failure or that is ascending or descending a grade by coupling a locomotive to the front or rear of the train. (b) "Hostler service" means moving a train or locomotive a short distance within a railroad yard or mechanical facility. (c) "Train" means 1 or more locomotives coupled with 1 or more freight cars.